Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3335
Veterinarian locum tenens; issuance;
requirements; term.

When
circumstances indicate a need for the issuance of a veterinarian locum tenens
in the State of Nebraska, the department, with the recommendation of the board,
may issue a veterinarian locum tenens to an individual who holds an active
license to practice veterinary medicine and surgery in another state if the
requirements regarding education and examination for licensure in that state
are equal to or exceed the requirements regarding education and examination
for licensure in Nebraska. A veterinarian locum tenens may be issued for a
period not to exceed ninety days in any twelve-month period.

Laws 2011, LB687, § 3.